Hawaii statutes.
PART IV.
MANAGEMENT OF STOCK FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS

§412:3-400 Applicability of part. This
part shall govern the management of all Hawaii financial institutions that are
stock financial institutions. [L 1993, c 350, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next